Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW to read as follows:The department shall cooperate with all law enforcement personnel as defined in RCW 43.101.010 in their efforts to investigate criminal activity and enforce the law including, but not limited to, requests to search the premises of an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020.--- END ---